Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1337DP.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1337DP (1) 91
jm/jh

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 11.6, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
2. a. A governmental subdivision contracting with certified
public accountants shall do so in a reasonable manner on the
basis of competence and qualification for the services required
and for a fair and reasonable price utilizing procedures which
include a written request for proposals.
b. Income received by a certified public accountant
performing an audit or examination of a governmental
subdivision pursuant to this section shall be exempt from
taxation under section 422.7 or 422.33, as applicable.
Sec. 2. Section 422.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 45. Subtract, to the extent included,
income received by a certified public accountant performing an
audit or examination of a governmental subdivision pursuant to
section 11.6.
Sec. 3. Section 422.35, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 14. Subtract, to the extent included,
income received by a certified public accountant performing an
audit or examination of a governmental subdivision pursuant to
section 11.6.
Sec. 4. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies
retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years beginning on
or after that date.